Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1263
Role of law enforcement.

At the request of a county attorney or the Attorney General acting under section 43-1262, a law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably necessary to locate a child or a party and assist a county attorney or the Attorney General with responsibilities under such section.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 38.